Nevada, session 83, AB508.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.228 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.228 1. The Economic Forum impaneled pursuant to NRS
353.226 shall:
-
*AB508*

– 3 –
(a) Make such projections for economic indicators as it deems
necessary to ensure that an accurate estimate is produced pursuant to
paragraph (b);
(b) Provide an accurate estimate of the revenue that will be
collected by the State [for] during the biennium that begins on
July 1 of the year following the date on which the Economic
Forum was empaneled:
(1) For general, unrestricted uses, and not for special
purposes [, during the biennium that begins on July 1 of the year
following the date on which the Economic Forum was empaneled;] ;
and
(2) For deposit to the credit of the State Education Fund;
(c) Request such technical assistance as the Economic Forum
deems necessary from the Technical Advisory Committee created
by NRS 353.229;
(d) On or before December 3 of each even-numbered year,
prepare a written report of its projections of economic indicators and
estimate of future state revenue required by paragraphs (a) and (b)
and present the report to the Governor and the Legislature;
(e) On or before May 1 of each odd-numbered year, prepare a
written report confirming or revising the projections of economic
indicators and estimate of future state revenue contained in the
report prepared pursuant to paragraph (d) and present the report to
the Governor and the Legislature; and
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, on or before
June 10 of each even-numbered year and December 10 of each odd-
numbered year, hold a meeting to consider current economic
indicators, including, without limitation, employment,
unemployment, personal income and any other indicators deemed
appropriate by the Economic Forum. Based on current economic
indicators, the Economic Forum shall update the status of actual
State General Fund revenue compared to the most recent forecast of
the Economic Forum. The provisions of this paragraph are not
intended to authorize the Economic Forum to make additional
forecasts pursuant to paragraph (b). At the next appropriate meeting
of the Interim Finance Committee, the Chair of the Economic
Forum or a member of the staff of the Economic Forum shall
present to the Interim Finance Committee such matters considered at
the meeting of the Economic Forum held pursuant to this paragraph,
as the Economic Forum determines appropriate. Any such
information presented to the Interim Finance Committee must be
made available on the Internet website of the Legislature.
2. If the deadline for preparing a report or holding a meeting as
required in subsection 1 falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal
-
*AB508*

– 4 –
holiday, the deadline is extended to the second business day
following the deadline.
3. The Economic Forum may make preliminary projections of
economic indicators and estimates of future state revenue at any
time. Any such projections and estimates must be made available to
the various agencies of the State through the Chief.
4. The Economic Forum may request information directly from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education. A state agency, including, without limitation,
the Nevada System of Higher Education, that receives a reasonable
request for information from the Economic Forum shall comply
with the request as soon as is reasonably practicable after receiving
the request.
5. The Economic Forum may request direct testimony from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education, at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the
Technical Advisory Committee. The head, or a designee thereof, of
a state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System of
Higher Education, who receives a reasonable request for direct
testimony at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the Technical
Advisory Committee shall appear at the meeting and shall comply
with the request.
6. To carry out its duties pursuant to this section, the Economic
Forum may consider any information received from the Technical
Advisory Committee and any other information received from
independent sources.
7. Copies of the projections and estimates made pursuant to
this section must be made available to the public by the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for the cost of reproducing the
material.
Sec. 2. NRS 372A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
372A.290 1. An excise tax is hereby imposed on the first
wholesale sale in this State of cannabis by a medical cannabis
cultivation facility to another cannabis establishment at the rate of
15 percent of:
(a) The fair market value at wholesale of the cannabis, if the sale
is made to an affiliate of the medical cannabis cultivation facility; or
(b) The sales price of the cannabis, if the sale is made to a
cannabis establishment that is not an affiliate of the medical
cannabis cultivation facility.
 The excise tax imposed pursuant to this subsection is the
obligation of the medical cannabis cultivation facility.
2. An excise tax is hereby imposed on the first wholesale sale
in this State of cannabis by an adult-use cannabis cultivation facility
to another cannabis establishment at the rate of 15 percent of:
-
*AB508*

– 5 –
(a) The fair market value at wholesale of the cannabis, if the sale
is made to an affiliate of the adult-use cannabis cultivation facility;
or
(b) The sales price of the cannabis, if the sale is made to a
cannabis establishment that is not an affiliate of the adult-use
cannabis cultivation facility.
 The excise tax imposed pursuant to this subsection is the
obligation of the adult-use cannabis cultivation facility.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, an excise tax
is hereby imposed on each retail sale in this State of cannabis or
cannabis products by an adult-use cannabis retail store or cannabis
consumption lounge at the rate of 10 percent of the sales price of the
cannabis or cannabis products. The excise tax imposed pursuant to
this subsection:
(a) Is the obligation of the seller of the cannabis or cannabis
product but may be recovered from the purchaser.
(b) Is separate from and in addition to any general state and
local sales and use taxes that apply to retail sales of tangible
personal property.
4. The revenues collected from the excise tax imposed pursuant
to subsection 1 must be distributed:
(a) To the Cannabis Compliance Board [and] for transfer to
local governments in an amount determined to be necessary by the
Board to pay the costs of the [Board and] local governments in
carrying out the provisions of chapter 678C of NRS; and
(b) If any money remains after the revenues are distributed
pursuant to paragraph (a), to the State Treasurer to be deposited to
the credit of the State Education Fund.
5. The revenues collected from the excise tax imposed pursuant
to subsection 2 must be distributed:
(a) To the Cannabis Compliance Board [and] for transfer to
local governments in an amount determined to be necessary by the
Board to pay the costs of the [Board and] local governments in
carrying out the provisions of chapter 678D of NRS; and
(b) If any money remains after the revenues are distributed
pursuant to paragraph (a), to the State Treasurer to be deposited to
the credit of the State Education Fund.
6. For the purpose of subsections 4 and 5, a total amount of
$5,000,000 of the revenues collected from the excise tax imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 and the excise tax imposed pursuant to
subsection 2 in each fiscal year shall be deemed sufficient to pay the
costs of all local governments to carry out the provisions of chapters
678C and 678D of NRS. The Board shall, by regulation, determine
the manner in which local governments may be reimbursed for the
-
*AB508*

– 6 –
costs of carrying out the provisions of chapters 678C and 678D of
NRS.
7. The revenues collected from the excise tax imposed pursuant
to subsection 3 must be paid over as collected to the State Treasurer
to be deposited to the credit of the State Education Fund.
8. The excise tax imposed pursuant to subsection 3 does not
apply to a sale of cannabis for the medical use of cannabis or a
medical cannabis product to the holder of a registry identification
card or letter of approval by an adult-use cannabis retail store that
has been deemed to be a dual licensee pursuant to NRS 678D.490.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Adult-use cannabis cultivation facility” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 678A.025.
(b) “Affiliate” means a person who, directly or indirectly
through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is
under common control with, a specified person.
(c) “Cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.120.
(d) “Letter of approval” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678C.070.
(e) “Local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 360.640.
(f) “Medical cannabis cultivation facility” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 678A.170.
(g) “Medical cannabis establishment” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 678A.180.
(h) “Medical cannabis product” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.200.
(i) “Medical use of cannabis” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 678A.215.
(j) “Registry identification card” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 678C.080.
(k) “Wholesale sale” means the first sale or transfer of cannabis
by a cannabis cultivation facility to another cannabis establishment.
The term does not include a transfer of cannabis by a cannabis
cultivation facility to another cannabis cultivation facility when both
cannabis cultivation facilities share identical ownership.
Sec. 3. NRS 387.1243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1243 1. The first apportionment based on an estimated
number of pupils and succeeding apportionments are subject to
adjustment from time to time as the need therefor may appear,
including, without limitation, an adjustment made for a pupil who is
not properly enrolled in or attending a public school, as determined
through an independent audit or other examination conducted
-
*AB508*

– 7 –
pursuant to NRS 387.1238 or through an annual audit of the count
of pupils conducted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 387.304.
2. On or before August 1 of each year, the board of trustees of
a school district shall provide to the Department, in a format
prescribed by the Department, the count of pupils calculated
pursuant to subparagraph (7) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 387.1223 who completed at least one semester during the
immediately preceding school year.
3. If the final computation of apportionment for any school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils exceeds the actual amount paid to the school district, charter
school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils during the
school year, the additional amount due must be paid before
September 1. If the final computation of apportionment for any
school district, charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils is less than the actual amount paid to the school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly
gifted pupils during the school year, the difference must be repaid
to the State Education Fund by the school district, charter school
or university school for profoundly gifted pupils before
September [25.] 1.
Sec. 4. NRS 387.12455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.12455 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
for the purpose of establishing budgetary estimates for expenditures
and revenues for the State Education Fund as prescribed by the State
Budget Act, the Governor shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that
an amount of money in the State General Fund is reserved in the
proposed executive budget for transfer to the State Education Fund
which is sufficient to fully fund:
(a) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase , [by a rate that
is greater than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of
enrollment in the public schools in this State in the immediately
preceding biennium,] an amount of money in the State General Fund
for transfer to the State Education Fund for the subsequent biennium
which is not less than the amount of money transferred to the State
Education Fund from the State General Fund for the immediately
preceding biennium increased by an amount not less than the rate of
increase for the revenue collected by the State for general,
unrestricted uses as projected by the Economic Forum.
(b) [If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected
by the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase by a rate that
is not greater than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of
enrollment in the public schools in this State in the immediately
preceding biennium, an amount of money in the State General Fund
-
*AB508*

– 8 –
for transfer to the State Education Fund for the subsequent biennium
which is not less than the amount of money transferred to the State
Education Fund from the State General Fund for the immediately
preceding biennium increased by an amount not less than the
combined rate of inflation and the growth of enrollment in the
public schools in this State.
(c)] If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected
by the State for general, unrestricted uses will decrease, an amount
of money in the State General Fund for transfer to the State
Education Fund for the subsequent biennium which is not less than
the amount of money transferred to the State Education Fund from
the State General Fund for the immediately preceding biennium
decreased by an amount not greater than the rate of decrease for the
revenue collected by the State as projected by the Economic Forum.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, as part of the
proposed executive budget, the Governor shall, to the extent
practicable, include recommendations for:
(a) The statewide base per pupil funding amount, which must be
equal to the statewide base per pupil funding amount for the
immediately preceding biennium increased by an amount not less
than the [combined] rate of inflation [and the growth of enrollment
in the public schools] in this State unless the amount of money
contained in the State Education Fund, excluding the Education
Stabilization Account, decreases from the immediately preceding
biennium, in which event the Governor must recommend a
proportional reduction to both the statewide base per pupil funding
amount and the multiplier for each category of pupils pursuant to
paragraph (b); and
(b) The multiplier for each category of pupils, which must not
be less than the multiplier for the immediately preceding biennium
unless:
(1) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, decreases
from the immediately preceding biennium, in which event the
Governor must recommend a proportional reduction to both the
statewide base per pupil funding amount pursuant to paragraph (a)
and the multiplier for each category of pupils; or
(2) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, increases
from the preceding fiscal year but in an amount which, after
recommending the statewide base per pupil funding amount
pursuant to paragraph (a), is insufficient to fund the multiplier for
each category of pupils, in which event the Governor must
recommend the remaining money in the State Education Fund,
excluding the Education Stabilization Account, be used to provide a
-
*AB508*

– 9 –
multiplier for each category of pupils which is as close as
practicable to the multiplier for the preceding fiscal year.
3. When determining the amount of money to reserve for
transfer from the State General Fund to the State Education Fund
pursuant to subsection 1, the Governor shall consider the
recommendations of the Commission, as revised by the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, if applicable, for an
optimal level of funding for education and may reserve an additional
amount of money for transfer to the State Education Fund that the
Governor determines to be sufficient to fund any recommendation
or any portion of a recommendation that the Governor includes in
the proposed executive budget.
4. As part of the proposed executive budget, the Governor may
recommend to the Legislature a revision to any appropriation made
by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214, including, without limitation, the
statewide base per pupil funding amount, the adjusted base per pupil
funding for any school district, the multiplier for weighted funding
for any category of pupils or the creation or elimination of a
category of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. The
Governor may recommend additional funding for any
recommendation made pursuant to this subsection.
5. If the Governor determines that it would be impracticable to
prepare the proposed executive budget as described in subsection 1
or 2, the Governor may instead include in the proposed executive
budget a recommendation for such funding for the public schools in
this State as he or she determines to be appropriate. If the Governor
includes in the proposed executive budget recommendations
pursuant to this subsection, the recommendations must be
accompanied by such recommendations for legislation as the
Governor determines to be appropriate to improve the method by
which funding for the public schools in this State is determined.
6. As used in this section, “rate of inflation” means the average
percentage of increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the
United States Department of Labor for the immediately preceding 3
calendar years or, if that index ceases to be published by the United
States Department of Labor, the published index that most closely
resembles that index, as determined by the Governor.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Cannabis Compliance Board to pay the costs of
the Board in carrying out the provisions of chapters 678C and 678D
of NRS the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $15,969,281
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $16,423,385
-
*AB508*

– 10 –
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB508*